Utah statutes.
31A-31-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Authorized agency" means:

(a)  the attorney general;

(b)  the state fire marshal;

(c)  any state law enforcement agency;

(d)  any criminal investigative department or agency of the United States;

(e)  a district attorney;

(f)  the prosecuting attorney of any municipality or county;

(g)  the department; or

(h)  the disciplinary section of an agency licensing a service provider.

(2)  "Financial loss" includes:

(a)  out-of-pocket expenses;

(b)  reasonable attorney fees;

(c)  repair and replacement costs; or

(d)  claims payments.

(3)  "Insurer" means any person or aggregation of persons:

(a)  doing insurance business, as defined in Section 31A-1-301; or

(b)  subject to the supervision of the commissioner under:

(i)  this title; or

(ii)  any equivalent insurance supervisory official of another state.

(4)  "Knowingly" has the same meaning as in Subsection 76-2-103(2).

(5)  "Person" means an individual, firm, company, corporation, association, limited liability company, partnership, organization, society, business trust, service provider, or any other legal entity.

(6) (a)  "Runner" means a person who procures clients at the direction of, or in cooperation with a person who intends to:

(i)  perform or obtain a service or benefit under a contract of insurance; or

(ii)  assert a claim against an insured.

(b)  "Runner" includes:

(i)  a capper; or

(ii)  a steerer.

(7)  "Service provider" means:

(a)  an individual licensed to practice law;

(b)  an individual licensed or certified by the state under:

(i)  this title;

(ii)  Title 41, Chapter 3, Motor Vehicle Business Regulation Act;

(iii)  Title 58, Occupations and Professions; or

(iv)  Title 61, Securities Division - Real Estate Division;

(c)  an individual licensed in another jurisdiction in a manner similar to a license described in Subsection (7)(a) or (b);

(d)  an individual practicing any nonmedical treatment rendered in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing; or

(e)  a hospital, health care facility, or person whose services are compensated directly or indirectly by insurance.

(8)  "Statement" includes any:

(a) (i)  notice;

(ii)  statement;

(iii)  proof of loss;

(iv)  bill of lading;

(v)  receipt for payment;

(vi)  invoice;

(vii)  account;

(viii)  estimate of property damage;

(ix)  bill for services;

(x)  diagnosis;

(xi)  prescription;

(xii)  hospital or doctor record;

(xiii)  x-ray;

(xiv)  test result; or

(xv)  other evidence of loss, injury, or expense; or

(b)  item listed in Subsection (8)(a) that is a computer-generated document.

